District of Columbia statutes.
1-813.02

Reports by Comptroller General.

(a)

In general. —

The Comptroller General is authorized to conduct evaluations of the administration of this chapter to ensure that the Trust Fund and Federal Supplemental Fund are being properly administered and shall report the findings of such evaluations to the Secretary and the Congress.

(b)

—

Access to information. For the purpose of evaluations under subsection (a) of this section the Comptroller General, subject to § 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 [26 U.S.C. § 6103], shall have access to and the right to copy any books, accounts, records, correspondence or other pertinent documents that are in the possession of the Secretary or the Trustee, or any contractor or subcontractor of the Secretary or the Trustee.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 728, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11062

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-817.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-767.2.

References in Text

“ Section 6103 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,” referred to in (b), is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 6103.